Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1329.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 25, chapter 4, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 25-419, to read: START_STATUTE25-419. Professional personnel; liability A parent may bring a civil action against any professional personnel who is appointed by the court in any matter involving legal decision-making or parenting time for a deviation from the professional personnel's ethics and standards that are prescribed by the professional personnel's licensing agency and licensing requirements.  A parent shall commence an action pursuant to this section within four years after the cause of action accrues. END_STATUTE